California, session 20252026, AB316.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 1714.46 is added to the Civil Code, to read:1714.46. (a) “Artificial intelligence” means an engineered or machine-based system that varies in its level of autonomy and that can, for explicit or implicit objectives, infer from the input it receives how to generate outputs that can influence physical or virtual environments.(b) In an action against a defendant who developed, modified, or used artificial intelligence that is alleged to have caused a harm to the plaintiff, it shall not be a defense, and the defendant may not assert, that the artificial intelligence autonomously caused the harm to the plaintiff.(c) This section does not limit or preclude a defendant from presenting either of the following:(1) Any other affirmative defense, including evidence relevant to causation or foreseeability.(2) Other evidence relevant to the comparative fault of any other person or entity.